Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Assets and Liabilities Generally

§ 26-6-101.
Assets allowed.

In any determination of an insurer’s financial condition, only the insurer owned assets set forth and allowed in the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual or authorized in accordance with this section shall be allowed as assets. Assets not inconsistent with this article shall be allowed at values the commissioner determines, if he deems them available for the payment of losses and claims.

through (xiv) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 9, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 94; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-94; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-6-102.
Assets not allowed.

In addition to assets impliedly excluded by the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual pursuant to W.S.

26-6-101

, the following are not allowed as assets in any determination of an insurer’s financial condition:

Goodwill, trade names and other similar intangible assets;

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 9, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 95; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-95; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-6-103.
Liabilities generally.

In any determination of an insurer’s financial condition, capital stock and liabilities to be charged against its assets include the capital stock and liability items set forth in the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual and the following:

The amount of its capital stock outstanding, if any;

The amount, estimated consistent with this code, necessary to pay all of its unpaid losses and claims incurred on or prior to the date of statement together with the expenses of adjustment or settlement thereof;

Concerning life insurance and annuity contracts and disability and accidental death benefits in or supplemental thereto:

The amount of reserves on life insurance policies and annuity contracts in force, valued according to the mortality tables, rates of interest and methods adopted pursuant to this code [title 26] which are applicable thereto;

Reserves for disability benefits for both active and disabled lives;

Reserves for accidental death benefits;

Any additional reserves the commissioner requires consistent with applicable customary and general practice in insurance accounting.

Concerning disability insurance, the reserves required under W.S.

26-6-107

;

Concerning insurance other than specified in paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection, and other than title insurance, the amount of reserves equal to the unearned portions of the gross premiums charged on policies in force, computed in accordance with this chapter;

Taxes, expenses and other obligations due or accrued at the date of the statement.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 96; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-96; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-6-104.
Disallowance of “wash” transactions.

The commissioner, after a hearing thereon, shall disallow as an asset or as a credit against liabilities any reinsurance he finds to have been arranged principally for the purpose of deception as to the ceding insurer’s financial condition on the date of an insurer’s financial statement. Without limiting the general purport of this provision, reinsurance of any substantial part of the insurer’s outstanding risks contracted for in fact within four (4) months prior to the date of a financial statement and cancelled after the date of that statement, or reinsurance under which the reinsurer bears no substantial insurance risk or chance of net loss to itself, is prima facie evidence of an arrangement principally for the purpose of deception.

The commissioner, after a hearing thereon, shall disallow as an insurer’s asset any deposit, funds or other assets he finds:

Not to be in good faith the insurer’s property;

Not freely subject to the insurer’s withdrawal or liquidation at any time for the payment or discharge of claims or other obligations arising under its policies; and

To be resulting from arrangements made principally for the purpose of deception as to the insurer’s financial condition on the date of any financial statement of the insurer.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of any insurer which has knowingly been a party to any actual or attempted deception.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 98; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-98; W.S. 1977, §

26-6-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-6-105.
Unearned premium reserve; generally.

As to property, casualty and surety insurances the insurer shall maintain an unearned premium reserve on all policies in force as required under regulations adopted by the commissioner. In promulgating regulations under this subsection, the commissioner shall take into consideration standards recommended by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 57, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 99; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-99; W.S. 1977, §

26-6-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2000, ch. 57, §§ 1, 2.

§ 26-6-106.
Unearned premium reserve; marine and transportation insurance.

As to marine and transportation insurance, the unearned premium reserve shall be determined pursuant to the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 100; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-100; W.S. 1977, §

26-6-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-6-107.
Unearned premium reserve; reserve for disability insurance.

For all disability insurance policies the insurer shall maintain an active life reserve which shall place a sound value on its liabilities under those policies and be not less than the reserve according to appropriate standards set forth in regulations the commissioner issues, but not less in the aggregate than the pro rata gross unearned premiums for the policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 101; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-101; W.S. 1977, §

26-6-108

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-6-108.
Unearned premium reserve; increase of inadequate reserves.

If an insurer’s loss experience shows or the commissioner determines that its loss reserves are inadequate, the insurer shall maintain loss reserves in an increased amount as is needed to make them adequate.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 102; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-102; W.S. 1977, § 26-6-109; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.